src/fst/morphology/affixes/Der_vv_IV.lexc
+(L)LUINNAR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv+NGA+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:l2uinnassangananngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+(L)LUINNAR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv+NGA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:l2uinnassanganngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+(L)LUINNAR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv+NGA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:l2uinnassanganngikkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+(L)LUINNAR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv+NGA+Der/vv+TIP+Der/vv:l2uinnassangatip HTR_C_TAQ_tsi ;
+(L)LUINNAR+Der/vv+TIGE+Der/vv:l2uinnartig flex-iv_schwa ;
+(R)PALAAR+Der/vv+GUSUP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:p2alaarusunngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+(R)PALLAP+Der/vv:p2allap IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PALLAP+Der/vv+ALLAP+Der/vv:p2allaallap IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PALLAP+Der/vv+ALLAP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2allaallakkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PALLAP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2allakkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PALLAP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+SINNAR+Der/vv:p2allakkaluarsinnar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PALLAP+Der/vv+GIARTUR+Der/vv:p2allakkiartor IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PALLAP+Der/vv+GUMAAR+Der/vv:p2allakkumaar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PALLAP+Der/vv+GUMAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2allakkumaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PALLAP+Der/vv+LAAR+Der/vv:p2allalaar IV-mod_laar ;
+(R)PALLAP+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv:p2allanniar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PALLAP+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2allanniaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PALLAP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:p2allanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+(R)PALLAP+Der/vv+NNGUAR+Der/vv:p2allannguar IV-mod_nnguar ;
+(R)PALLAP+Der/vv+NNGUAR+Der/vv+TSIAR+Der/vv:p2allannguatsiar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PALLAP+Der/vv+NNGUAR+Der/vv+TSIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2allannguatsiaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PALLAP+Der/vv+RATAAR+Der/vv:p2allarataar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PALLAP+Der/vv+RATAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2allarataaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PALLAP+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv:p2allariar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PALLAP+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2allariaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PALLAP+Der/vv+RIIR+Der/vv:p2allareer IV-mod_iC ;
+(R)PALLAP+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv:p2allassima IV-mod_V ;
+(R)PALLAP+Der/vv+SINNAA+Der/vv:p2allassinnaa IV-mod_V ;
+(R)PALLAP+Der/vv+SINNAA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:p2allassinnaanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+(R)PALLAP+Der/vv+SINNAR+Der/vv:p2allassinnar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PALLAP+Der/vv+SINNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2allassinnaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PALLAP+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:p2allassa IV-mod_ssa ;
+(R)PALLAP+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2allassagaluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PALLAP+Der/vv+TARE+Der/vv:p2allattar flex-iv_schwa ;
+(R)PALLAP+Der/vv+TIP+Der/vv:p2allatsip HTR_C_TAQ_tsi ;
+(R)PALUP+Der/vv:p2alup IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PALUP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2alukkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PALUP+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv:p2alulluinnar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PALUP+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2alulluinnaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PALUP+Der/vv+NGAAR+Der/vv:p2alungaar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PALUP+Der/vv+NGAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2alungaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PALUP+Der/vv+NGAJAP+Der/vv:p2alungajap IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PALUP+Der/vv+NGAJAP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2alungajakkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PALUP+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv:p2alunniavip IV-mod_iC ;
+(R)PALUP+Der/vv+NIR+Der/vv:p2alunner XIiX_fleksiver ;
+(R)PALUP+Der/vv+NIRU+Der/vv:p2alunneru IV-mod_V ;
+(R)PALUP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:p2alunngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+(R)PALUP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv:p2alunngivip IV-mod_iC ;
+(R)PALUP+Der/vv+NNGUATSIAR+Der/vv:p2alunnguatsiar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PALUP+Der/vv+NNGUATSIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2alunnguatsiaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PALUP+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:p2alo%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ; 
+(R)PALUP+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv:p2aloriar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PALUP+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2aloriaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PALUP+Der/vv+SURE+Der/vv+NAR+Der/vv:p2alussorinar IV-mod_nar ; !12052020 panie
+(R)PALUP+Der/vv+TIGE+Der/vv:p2alutsig flex-iv_schwa ;
+(R)PALUP+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv:p2aluttuar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PALUP+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2aluttuaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PALUP+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv:p2aluip IV-mod_iC ;
+(R)PALUP+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2aluikkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PALUP+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:p2aluikkalua%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ;
+(R)PASIP+Der/vv:p2asip IV-mod_iC ;
+(R)PASIP+Der/vv+GUNNAIR+Der/vv:p2asikkunnaar IV-mod_iC ;
+(R)PASIP+Der/vv+GUNNAIR+Der/vv+NIRU+Der/vv:p2asikkunnaarneru IV-mod_V ;
+(R)PASIP+Der/vv+GUNNAIR+Der/vv+NIRU+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv:p2asikkunnaarneruniar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PASIP+Der/vv+GUNNAIR+Der/vv+NIRU+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2asikkunnaarneruniaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PASIP+Der/vv+GUNNAIR+Der/vv+NIRU+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:p2asikkunnaarneruniassa IV-mod_ssa ;
+(R)PASIP+Der/vv+GUNNAIR+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv:p2asikkunnaariar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PASIP+Der/vv+GUNNAIR+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2asikkunnaariaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PASIP+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv:p2asiinnar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PASIP+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2asiinnaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PASIP+Der/vv+LAAR+Der/vv:p2asilaar IV-mod_laar ;
+(R)PASIP+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv:p2asilluinnar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PASIP+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2asilluinnaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PASIP+Der/vv+NGAAR+Der/vv:p2asingaar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PASIP+Der/vv+NGAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2asingaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PASIP+Der/vv+NIRU+Der/vv:p2asinneru IV-mod_V ;
+(R)PASIP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:p2asinngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+(R)PASIP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv:p2asinngilluinnar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PASIP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+LLUINNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2asinngilluinnaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PASIP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv:p2asinngivip IV-mod_iC ;
+(R)PASIP+Der/vv+QE+Der/vv:p2ase%TRUNCq IV-mod_qe ; 
+(R)PASIP+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv:p2aseriar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PASIP+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2aseriaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PASIP+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv:p2asittuaannar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PASIP+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2asittuaannaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv:p2iar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+GALLAR+Der/vv:p2iarallar gallar-iv ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2iaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv:p2iarunar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2iarunaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:p2iarunanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2iarunanngikkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+GUNNAIR+Der/vv:p2iarunnaar IV-mod_iC ; !14042020 panie
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NIKUU+Der/vv:p2iarnikuu IV-mod_V ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NIKUU+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:p2iarnikuunngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:p2ianngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+GALLAR+Der/vv:p2ianngikkallar gallar-iv ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2ianngikkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv:p2ianngikkunar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2ianngikkunaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv:p2ianngiinnar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+INNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2ianngiinnaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+KULAAR+Der/vv:p2ianngikulaar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+KULAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2ianngikulaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+NGAJAP+Der/vv:p2ianngingajap IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+NGAJAP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2ianngingajakkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+NIKUU+Der/vv:p2iannginnikuu IV-mod_V ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+NIRAR+Der/vv:p2iannginnerar HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+NNGUATSIAR+Der/vv:p2iannginnguatsiar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+NNGUATSIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2iannginnguatsiaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+PAJAAR+Der/vv:p2ianngipajaar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+PAJAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2ianngipajaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+PALUP+Der/vv:p2ianngippalup IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+PALUP+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2ianngippalukkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+PASIP+Der/vv:p2ianngippasip IV-mod_iC ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+QATTAAR+Der/vv:p2ianngeqattaar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+QATTAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2ianngeqattaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+RATAR+Der/vv:p2ianngeratar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+RATAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2ianngerataraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv:p2ianngeriar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2ianngeriaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+RIIR+Der/vv:p2ianngereer IV-mod_iC ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+RUJUUR+Der/vv:p2ianngerujoor IV-mod_rujuur ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+RUSAAR+Der/vv:p2ianngerusaar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+RUSAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2ianngerusaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+RUUSAAR+Der/vv:p2ianngeruusaar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+RUUSAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2ianngeruusaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv:p2ianngissima IV-mod_V ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+SINNAA+Der/vv:p2ianngissinnaa IV-mod_V ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv:p2ianngittuar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2ianngittuaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+TUUR+Der/vv:p2ianngitsoor IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+TUUR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2ianngitsooraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+VALLAAR+Der/vv:p2ianngippallaar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+VALLAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2ianngippallaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+VIP+Der/vv:p2ianngivip IV-mod_iC ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+PALUP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:p2iarpalunngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+PASIP+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:p2iarpasinngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv:p2iarsima IV-mod_V ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:p2iarsimanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2iarsimanngikkaluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv:p2iarsimanngeriar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2iarsimanngeriaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+SINNAA+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:p2iarsinnaanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+SSA+Der/vv:p2iassa IV-mod_ssa ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+SSAAR+Der/vv:p2iassaar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+SSAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2iassaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+SSAAR+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv:p2iassaarunar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+SSAAR+Der/vv+GUNAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:p2iassaarunaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+SSAAR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv:p2iassaarsima IV-mod_V ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+TUAR+Der/vv+IT+Der/vv:p2iajuip XItsX ;
+(R)PIAR+Der/vv+VALLAAR+Der/vv+NNGIT+Der/vv:p2iarpallaanngi IV-mod_nngit ;
+(R)SUAR+Der/vv:s2uar SUAR_gennemgang ;
+(R)SUAR+Der/vv+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:suaar SUAR_gennemgang ;
+(R)SUAR+Der/vv+LIR+Der/vv:s2ualer IV-mod_iC ;
+(R)SUAR+Der/vv+LIR+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv:s2ualeriar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)SUAR+Der/vv+LIR+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:s2ualeriaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)SUAR+Der/vv+LIR+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv+NNGUAR+Der/vv:s2ualeriannguar IV-mod_nnguar ;
+(R)SUAR+Der/vv+LLAR+Der/vv:s2uallar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)SUAR+Der/vv+Orth/Alt+LLAR+Der/vv:s2uaallar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)SUAR+Der/vv+LLAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:s2uallaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)SUAR+Der/vv+Orth/Alt+LLAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:s2uaallaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)SUAR+Der/vv+NIAR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv:s2uarniarsima IV-mod_V ;
+(R)SUAR+Der/vv+QQAAR+Der/vv:s2uaqqaar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)SUAR+Der/vv+QQAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:s2uaqqaaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)SUAR+Der/vv+QQAAR+Der/vv+RIAR+Der/vv:s2uaqqaariar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)SUATAAR+Der/vv:s2uataar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)SUATAAR+Der/vv+GALUAR+Der/vv:s2uataaraluar IV-mod_C ;
+(R)SUATAAR+Der/vv+SIMA+Der/vv:suataarsima IV-mod_V ;
+(R)SUATAAR+Der/vv+UTIGE+Der/vv:s2uataajutig flex-iv_schwa ;

! recessive
